District of Columbia statutes.
22-3007

Defense to sexual abuse.

Consent by the victim is a defense to a prosecution under §§ 22-3002 to 22-3006, prosecuted alone or in conjunction with charges under § 22-3018 or §§ 22-401 and 22-403.

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 206, 42 DCR 53
Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 213, 56 DCR 7413
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 213 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 213 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
D.C. Law 18-88 deleted “defense, which the defendant must establish by a preponderance of the evidence,” following “defense”.
1981 Ed., § 22-4107.